District of Columbia statutes.
2-809

Penalty.

A person violating a regulation prescribed under this chapter shall be fined under Title 18 [of the U.S. Code] or imprisoned for not more than 30 days. A separate violation occurs under this section for each day the violation continues.

History

Aug. 12, 1998, 112 Stat. 1265, Pub. L. 105-225, § 509

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1059.

References in Text

“Title 18,” referred to in this section, is Title 18 of the U.S. Code.